Utah statutes.
62A-3-308.   Peace officer's authority to transport -- Notification.

(1)  A peace officer may remove and transport, or cause to have transported, a vulnerable adult to an appropriate medical or shelter facility, if:

(a)  the officer has probable cause to believe that:

(i)  by reason of abuse, neglect, or exploitation there exist exigent circumstances; and

(ii)  the vulnerable adult will suffer serious physical injury or death if not immediately placed in a safe environment;

(b)  the vulnerable adult refuses to consent or lacks capacity to consent; and

(c)  there is not time to notify interested parties or to apply for a warrant or other court order.

(2) A peace officer described in Subsection (1) shall, within four hours after a vulnerable adult is transported to an appropriate medical or shelter facility:

(a)  notify Adult Protective Services intake; and

(b)  request that Adult Protective Services or the division file a petition with the court for an emergency protective order.

